Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 8
CEMETERY DISTRICTS

Editor's note:

Prior to the enactment of this part 8 in 1981, the substantive provisions of this part 8 were located in part 1 of article 5 of title 32. For a detailed comparison of this part 8, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this part 8, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

30-20-801. Creation of cemetery districts.

The board of county commissioners of any county shall create cemetery districts within its county upon petition of the property owners within said districts, in accordance with the provisions of this part 8.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1613, § 12, effective June 19.

30-20-802. Petition for creation of district.

Upon presentation to the board of county commissioners of a petition setting forth the name of the proposed cemetery district, a description of the boundaries of said district, the names of three taxpaying electors resident within such district to be appointed as the first board of directors of said proposed district, and a request for the organization thereof, signed by a majority of the taxpaying electors resident therein, it is the duty of the board of county commissioners of such county to examine the petition and, if it finds that the petition is regular and in due form as provided, and if the board of county commissioners finds that said petition has been signed by a majority of the taxpaying electors, to enter a resolution in its proceedings establishing said cemetery district and to file a certified copy of such resolution with the county clerk and recorder.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1613, § 12, effective June 19.

30-20-803. Board of directors - meetings.

Immediately after the creation of a cemetery district, the board of county commissioners shall appoint a board of directors for the cemetery district, consisting of the three members recommended in the petition filed with the board of county commissioners. One of the members shall hold the office for two years, one for four years, and one for six years. Thereafter the term of office for each director is six years. Vacancies in the board of directors shall be filled by the board of county commissioners. The board of county commissioners may remove any director for cause, but only after the director is given notice and an opportunity to be heard before the board of county commissioners at a public hearing.

All special and regular meetings of the board of directors must be held at locations that are within the boundaries of the cemetery district or that are within the boundaries of any county in which the cemetery district is located, in whole or in part, or in any county so long as the meeting location does not exceed twenty miles from the district boundaries. The provisions of this subsection (2) governing the location of meetings may be waived only if the proposed change of location of a meeting of the board appears on the agenda of a regular or special meeting of the board and if a resolution is adopted by the board stating the reason for which a meeting of the board is to be held in a location other than under the provisions of this subsection (2) and further stating the date, time, and place of such meeting.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1613, § 12, effective June 19.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1496, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-075), ch. 35, p. 188, § 1, effective August 10.

30-20-804. District officers.

The officers of such cemetery district shall be the president and a secretary who shall be elected annually by the board of directors from its own members.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1613, § 12, effective June 19.

30-20-805. Powers of district.

From and after the filing of the resolution establishing such district with the county clerk and recorder, the cemetery district shall be a body corporate and shall have the following powers:

To acquire, hold, and convey real and personal property for cemetery purposes within said district;

To sue and be sued in its corporate name;

To receive, acquire, and hold donations or bequests of real or personal property;

To sell burial plots in the cemetery property acquired by said district;

To draw warrants upon the county treasurer for cemetery purposes;

To determine annually the amount of tax not to exceed four mills, to be levied upon the taxable property of said district, to acquire, care for, and maintain such cemetery for the ensuing year, and to certify the same to the board of county commissioners. Any amount of tax levy not previously established by resolution nor previously approved by the electors must be authorized by a vote of the electors of that cemetery district.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1614, § 12, effective June 19.

L. 95:

(1)(f) amended, p. 61, § 1, effective March 23.

30-20-806. Taxation.

The board of county commissioners is authorized to levy a tax not to exceed four mills so certified to it by said cemetery district against all taxable property within said cemetery district which tax shall be collected by the county treasurer. If the district embraces the entire county, the board of county commissioners is authorized to appropriate from the general fund money for this purpose and no special tax shall be made.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1614, § 12, effective June 19.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 61, § 2, effective March 23.

30-20-807. Cemetery district fund.

All moneys belonging to or collected on behalf of said cemetery district may be deposited with the county treasurer of the county in which said district is located in a fund known as .............. cemetery district fund. Expenditures therefrom shall be made by the county treasurer upon warrants drawn thereon by the president and secretary of said cemetery district.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1614, § 12, effective June 19.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 107, § 1, effective August 5.

30-20-808. Abandoned graves - right to reclaim.

If there is a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt in a cemetery in which no remains have been interred, no burial memorial has been placed, and no other improvement has been made for a continuous period of no less than seventy-five years, a cemetery district may initiate the process of reclaiming title to the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt in accordance with this section.

A cemetery district seeking to reclaim a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt shall:

Send written notice of the cemetery district's intent to reclaim title to the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt to the owner's last-known address by first-class mail; and

Publish a notice of the cemetery district's intent to reclaim title to the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt in a newspaper of general circulation in the area in which the cemetery is located once per week for four weeks.

The notice required by subsection (2) of this section shall clearly indicate that the cemetery district intends to terminate the owner's rights and title to the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt and include a recitation of the owner's right to notify the cemetery district of the owner's intent to retain ownership of the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt.

If the cemetery district does not receive from the owner of the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt a letter of intent to retain ownership of the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt within sixty days after the last publication of the notice required by paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section, all rights and title to the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt shall transfer to the cemetery district. The cemetery district may then sell, transfer, or otherwise dispose of the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt without risk of liability to the prior owner of the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt.

A cemetery district that reclaims title to a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt in accordance with this section shall retain in its records for no less than one year a copy of the notice sent pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section and a copy of the notice published pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section.

If a person submits to a cemetery district a legitimate claim to a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt that the cemetery district has reclaimed pursuant to this section, the cemetery district shall transfer to the person at no charge a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt that, to the extent possible, is equivalent to the reclaimed lot, grave space, niche, or crypt.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on and after August 7, 2006, a cemetery district shall not convey title to the real property surveyed as a lot in a cemetery for use as a burial space. A cemetery district may grant interment rights to a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt in a cemetery.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 443, § 3, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Section 5 of chapter 128, Session Laws of Colorado 2006, provides that the act enacting this section applies to cemetery lots, grave spaces, niches, and crypts purchased before, on, or after August 7, 2006.